BrailleTables/fr-integral.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2008 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# Définitions pour code braille français international unifié
# Par Nicolas Pitre <nico@cam.org>
# Référence: http://www.inlb.qc.ca/apropos/c2003unificationdubraille.aspx

capsign 46		indicateur de majuscule
begcaps 46-46		succession de majuscules

numsign 6		préfixe pour les chiffres
midnum \s 3		espace entre les chiffres
midnum , 2
midnum . 256
midnum - 36
midnum / 34
midnum : 25
endnum # 56-3456

always a 1		lettre a
always b 12		lettre b
always c 14		lettre c
always d 145		lettre d
always e 15		lettre e
always f 124		lettre f
always g 1245		lettre g
always h 125		lettre h
always i 24		lettre i
always j 245		lettre j
always k 13		lettre k
always l 123		lettre l
always m 134		lettre m
always n 1345		lettre n
always o 135		lettre o
always p 1234		lettre p
always q 12345		lettre q
always r 1235		lettre r
always s 234		lettre s
always t 2345		lettre t
always u 136		lettre u
always v 1236		lettre v
always x 1346		lettre x
always y 13456		lettre y
always z 1356		lettre z
always ç 12346		c cédille
always é 123456		e accent aigu
always à 12356		a accent grave
always è 2346		e accent grave
always ù 23456		u accent grave
always â 16		a accent circonflexe
always ê 126		e accent circonflexe
always î 146		i accent circonflexe
always ô 1456		o accent circonflexe
always û 156		u accent circonflexe
always ë 1246		e tréma
always ï 12456		i tréma
always ü 1256		u tréma
always oe 246		oe ligatur
always w 2456		lettre w

always A 1		lettre A
always B 12		lettre B
always C 14		lettre C
always D 145		lettre D
always E 15		lettre E
always F 124		lettre F
always G 1245		lettre G
always H 125		lettre H
always I 24		lettre I
always J 245		lettre J
always K 13		lettre K
always L 123		lettre L
always M 134		lettre M
always N 1345		lettre N
always O 135		lettre O
always P 1234		lettre P
always Q 12345		lettre Q
always R 1235		lettre R
always S 234		lettre S
always T 2345		lettre T
always U 136		lettre U
always V 1236		lettre V
always X 1346		lettre X
always Y 13456		lettre Y
always Z 1356		lettre Z
always Ç 12346		C cédille
always É 123456		E accent aigu
always À 12356		A accent grave
always È 2346		E accent grave
always Ù 23456		U accent grave
always Â 16		A accent circonflexe
always Ê 126		E accent circonflexe
always Î 146		I accent circonflexe
always Ô 1456		O accent circonflexe
always Û 156		U accent circonflexe
always Ë 1246		E tréma
always Ï 12456		I tréma
always Ü 1256		U tréma
always Oe 246		Oe ligatur
always W 2456		lettre w

always , 2		virgule
always ; 23		point-virgule
always : 25		deux-points
always . 256		point
always ? 26		point d'interrogation
always ! 235		point d'exclamation
always " 2356		guillemet
always ( 236		parenthèse ouvrante
always * 35		astérisque
always ) 356		parenthèse fermante
always ' 3		apostrophe
always / 34		barre oblique
always @ 345		arobas
always % 346		pour cent
always - 36		trait d'union
always # 3456		dièse

always 0 3456		zéro
always 1 16		un
always 2 126		deux
always 3 146		trois
always 4 1456		quatre
always 5 156		cinq
always 6 1246		six
always 7 12456		sept
always 8 1256		huit
always 9 246		neuf

always ÷ 6-256		divisé par
always + 6-235		plus
always = 6-2356		égal
always × 6-35		multiplié par
always < 46-126		inférieur à
always > 46-345		supérieur à

always © 5-14		copyright
always ° 5-135		degré
always & 5-123456	perluète (et commercial)
always ¢ 45-14		cent
always ¤ 45-15		euro
always £ 45-123		livre
always § 45-1234	paragraphe
always $ 45-234		dollar
always ¥ 45-13456	yen
always « 45-2356	guillemet français ouvrant
always » 2356-12	guillemet français fermant
always [ 45-236		crochet droit ouvrant
always ] 356-12		crochet droit fermant
always { 6-236		accolade de gauche
always } 356-3		accolade de droite

always ¹ 4-6-16		exposant 1
always ² 4-6-126	exposant 2
always ³ 4-6-146	exposant 3
always ¼ 6-16-34-1456	un quart
always ½ 6-16-34-126	un demi
always ¾ 6-126-34-1456	trois quarts

always _ 78		souligné

repeatable \s 0		espaces
repeatable \t 0		tabulations
repeatable \xa0 0		espaces insécables

repeatable ... 3-3-3		points de suite
repeatable --- 36-36-36
repeatable ___ 78-78-78

always \s--\s 36-36	tiret
